Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1

Establishment and General Provisions

69-5-101. County may establish levee and drainage districts and change natural watercourses.

The county court of any county is vested with the jurisdiction and authority at any regular, special, or adjourned session to establish a drainage district or districts, and to locate and establish levees, and cause to be constructed, as provided in this chapter, any levee, ditch, drain, or watercourse, or to straighten, widen, deepen, or change any natural watercourse in such county, or provide for such action being taken whenever it will be of public utility or conducive to the public health or welfare.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 1; Shan., § 3871a7; mod. Code 1932, § 4216; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-701; T.C.A. §69-6-101.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

Cross-References. Supplementary eminent domain proceedings for certain levee and drainage districts, §29-17-901.

Tax assessment of tracts partly in district, §67-5-803.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Drains and Sewers, §§ 4, 5, 7, 8, 12; 17 Tenn. Juris., Levees, § 1; 25 Tenn. Juris., Waters and Watercourses, § 16.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

69-5-102. Judicial jurisdiction and authority.

The court vested with the judicial jurisdiction and authority in this chapter is the circuit court, unless provided otherwise by public, private, local, or special act of the general assembly.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 1; Shan., § 3871a8; Code 1932, § 4217; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-702; Acts 1983, ch. 256, § 1; T.C.A. §69-6-102.

69-5-103. Petition for establishment of district — Bond for preliminary expenses.

Before any county court establishes a drainage or levee district, or any levee, ditch, drain, or watercourse improvement, as provided for in this chapter, a petition, signed as prescribed in §69-5-104, shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the improvement is expected to be made, setting forth that any body or district of land in such county, described by metes and bounds or otherwise, so as to convey an intelligible description of such lands, is subject to overflow, or too wet for profitable cultivation, and that the public health or welfare will be promoted by draining, ditching, or leveeing it, or by changing a natural watercourse, or by in part changing such watercourse by cutting across its bends and shortening its length, or by cleaning out its natural bed or deepening or enlarging such bed, or by giving such watercourse a new outlet, or any or all of these and similar things pertaining to the proposed improvement, and setting forth in the petition as near as may be the starting point, route, and terminus, and lateral branches, if with proper prayer for purpose desired; and there shall be filed with the petition a bond, with good security, in such penal sum as the clerk may deem adequate, to be approved by the clerk, and conditioned for the payment of all preliminary expenses until refunded, and of all costs and expenses incurred in the proceedings in case the county court does not grant the prayer of the petition, or the petition is dismissed for any cause. The county court may at any time deemed proper order the bond increased in penalty or in sufficiency, and make all necessary orders to this end.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 2; Shan., § 3871a9; Code 1932, § 4218; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-703; T.C.A. §69-6-103.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-104. Qualifications of petitioners.

The petition shall be signed by persons who own a majority of the acreage to be included in the proposed district.

Acts 1923, ch. 20, § 2; 1925, ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., § 3871a9; mod. Code 1932, § 4218a; Acts 1953, ch. 23, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-704; T.C.A. §69-6-104.

69-5-105. Compensation of attorneys.

The petitioners for the proposed district are authorized to employ counsel or attorneys to assist in filing the petition and in all preliminary matters necessary in having such district established, and attending to the matters thereof, so far as may be necessary and so far as the county court may think needed after the district is ordered established, contracting with such attorneys for the amount to be paid for their services, which contract shall be approved by the county court, if deemed reasonable; and if not deemed reasonable, the county court shall, by order, fix the amount to be allowed for such legal services, the court fixing such amount as it deems reasonable and proper; and the amount of fees thus fixed shall become a debt and charge against the district as other preliminary expenses are, such as charges for services of an engineer, and be paid in like manner.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 13; Shan., § 3871a141; Code 1932, § 4376; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-705; T.C.A. §69-6-105.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-106. Petitioners' committee.

The petitioners are authorized to select from their number a committee of three (3) or five (5), as they shall deem expedient, which committee shall act for the petitioners in all such preliminary matters as their services may be needed in having the district established, and which committee shall have the power to bind the petitioners in all preliminary matters looking to the establishment of the district. This committee shall elect out of its members such officers as it deems necessary, and shall keep a record of the committee's proceedings. The members of this committee shall receive for service such compensation as shall be fixed by the county court, which shall be paid out of the funds of the district when established in the same way as is provided for the payments of other just charges against the district.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 13; Shan., § 3871a142; Code 1932, § 4377; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-706; T.C.A. §69-6-106.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-107. Preliminary hearing — Notice and requisites.

When a petition is filed with all the necessary allegations, is sworn to by one (1) or more petitioners, and shows that fifty-one percent (51%) in acres of the land within the bounds of the district sought to be created is owned by the petitioners, and as further required by §69-5-103; when the petition is accompanied by a general plat, and a general description of the district sought to be created; when a description, by surrounding landowners, is given in the petition, of the respective tracts of land within the bounds and the names of the owners of the tracts, who are not petitioners are set out in the petition; when the petitioners ask that provision be made for funds to defray the preliminary costs and expenses up to the stage in the proceedings where the report of the commissioners for the assessment of benefits have been filed and confirmed; and when the court deems it expedient that provision should be made for such a fund, to cover the preliminary costs and expenses; then the court shall set a day for the hearing, and direct that publication for all landowners set out in the petition, who are not petitioners, be made in some newspaper published in the county in which the district is located, and if located in more than one (1) county, then in a newspaper in each county, in which the lands in the proposed district are located, the publications to be for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the day set for the hearing; and the publication shall notify such landowners of the pending suit, the prayer for the creation of a fund to pay the preliminary costs and expenses, the day fixed for the hearing, and notify them to appear and show cause why an assessment to create the fund should not be made.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a10; mod. Code 1932, § 4219; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-707; T.C.A. §69-6-107.

69-5-108. Preliminary hearing — Procedure and decree.

The landowners shall make their appearance and file their objections, if any, on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day set for hearing. After the hour fixed for the filing of objections, the court shall proceed to hear and determine the matter of making an assessment to raise a fund for the payment of the preliminary costs and expenses. The court will determine from proof offered, approximately, the amount necessary to cover the cost and expenses, and if the court is of the opinion that it is not expedient to make an assessment for such purposes, the court will so decree; but if the court is of the opinion that it is expedient, the court will make an assessment for the amount determined, upon the respective tracts of land set out in the petition, and make the assessment on the basis of acreage.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a11; Code 1932, § 4220; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-708; T.C.A. §69-6-108.

69-5-109. Appeal from preliminary decree.

Any party aggrieved may appeal from the decision of the court in making or refusing to make the assessment. The appeal shall be made in the same manner and upon the same terms provided for appeals from the action of the court in creating or refusing to create a drainage district as provided in part 5 of this chapter.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a12; Code 1932, § 4221; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-709; T.C.A. §69-6-109.

69-5-110. Assessment book — Collection by county trustee.

When the assessment has been made, the court will fix the dates within which the assessment shall be collected. The county clerk shall make out an assessment list, or book, giving alphabetically the name of the owner, and the boundaries of the land, the number of acres, and the amount assessed against each tract, and the clerk will make the same substantially in the form used for state and county tax books, and when so made the clerk will certify the same to the trustee of the county, and it shall be the duty of the trustee of the county to proceed at once to collect the assessments within the dates prescribed by the court. The trustee will pay the amount collected on the assessments to the county clerk, to be paid out on the cost and expenses under the orders of the court; and for collecting and paying over the assessments, the trustee will be allowed as compensation for collection and paying over the funds, two percent (2%) of the amount collected and paid over.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a13; Code 1932, § 4222; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-710; T.C.A. §69-6-110.

Cross-References. Compensation for collecting and paying out assessments and for certified statements, §69-5-835.

69-5-111. Collection of assessment by other counties.

If the district sought to be created embraces lands lying in more than one (1) county, the clerk of the county in which the petition was filed and in which the matter is pending will make out the assessment list, or book, for the entire district, and shall then copy so much of the assessment roll, or book, as contains the assessment on lands in any county, other than the county where the petition was filed, and the matter is pending, and certify under seal, that it is a correct copy of that part or portion of such roll, or book, and transmit or deliver it to the trustee of such other county, and take a receipt for it; and it shall be the duty of such trustee to receive and receipt for it, and collect it, and pay over the amount collected to the clerk of the county where the petition was filed, and the matter is pending.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a14; Code 1932, § 4223; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-711; T.C.A. §69-6-111.

69-5-112. Assessment constitutes lien.

The assessment so made shall be a lien upon the respective tracts of land upon which it is assessed; and this lien shall be enforced in the same manner as provided for the enforcement of liens in §§69-5-819 —69-5-823.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a15; Code 1932, § 4224; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-712; T.C.A. §69-6-112.

69-5-113. Assessments — Bonds of county trustee and county clerk.

The county trustee or trustees, before receiving the assessment roll, or book, and proceeding to the collection of the assessments, and the county clerk, before receiving the funds from the trustee or trustees, shall, respectively, enter into a bond in double the amount that will come into their hands, respectively, payable to the state of Tennessee, and conditioned for the faithful paying over and accounting for the funds arising from the assessment.

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a16; Code 1932, § 4225; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-713; T.C.A. §69-6-113.

69-5-114. Proceedings for preliminary expense fund not to delay other proceedings — Application of acreage provision.

This proceeding to create a fund for the payment of the cost and expenses shall not interfere with or delay the other proceedings, and the matter, in all other respects, may be proceeded with as provided in this part, and by law; provided, that the above percent acreage provision of §69-5-107 shall only apply to and be limited to a proceeding under §§69-5-107 —69-5-115(a).

Acts 1915, ch. 63, § 1; Shan., § 3871a17; Code 1932, § 4226; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-714; T.C.A. §69-6-114.

69-5-115. Engineer.

After such petition has been so filed and bond taken and approved, the county court shall, at the first session thereafter, regular, special, or adjourned, and may at a later session, appoint a disinterested and competent engineer and have placed in the engineer's hands a copy of the petition.

The engineer shall proceed to examine the lands described in the petition, and any other lands that would be benefited by the improvement, or necessary in carrying out such improvement, and survey and locate such drain or drains, ditch or ditches, levee or levees, improvement or improvements, as may be practicable to carry out the purposes of the petition and that will be of public benefit or utility or conducive to the public health or welfare.

Engineers appointed by the county courts shall be paid for their services at such rates as the courts appointing them may fix, and, if not so fixed, at the rate of five dollars ($5.00) per day while engaged in the work, and, in addition, all actual traveling expenses, an itemized account of such expenses to be kept by them and reported and sworn to.

The engineer shall return and file the proceedings with the county clerk, which return shall set forth the starting point, the route, the terminus, or termini of the ditch or ditches, drain or drains, levee or levees, or other improvements, such as the straightening or shortening of watercourses, cleaning out the beds thereof, together with a plat and profile showing the ditches, drains, or other improvements, and the course and length of the same, approximately, through each tract of land as far as may be practicable, and the total length and the course and the elevation, as near as may be, of all lakes, ponds, and deep depressions in the district, and the fall obtainable across the district, and the boundary of the proposed district, and the description of each tract of land in the district, as shown by the tax books, and the names of the owners of the tract, as shown by the tax books, together with the probable cost of the improvement, and such other facts and recommendations as the engineer may deem material.

The court may at any time recall the appointment of any engineer, if deemed advisable to do so, and appoint another to act in the engineer's place.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, §§ 3, 36; Shan., §§ 3871a18-3871a21, 3871a137; Code 1932, §§ 4227-4230, 4372; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-715 — 70-719; T.C.A. §69-6-115.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-116. Location of drains and ditches.

The ditches and drains provided for shall be surveyed and located along the general course of the natural streams and watercourses, or in the general course of the natural drainage of the lands of the district, unless there is some special and good reason why the natural course should be departed from to secure a new and better outlet, having due regard to the straightening and shortening of such natural streams, watercourses, and course of natural drainage.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 3; Shan., § 3871a22; Code 1932, § 4231; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-720; T.C.A. §69-6-116.

69-5-117. Drains and ditches crossing railroad property.

When such ditch or drain crosses any railroad track or right-of-way, it shall be located at the place of the natural waterway across the right-of-way, unless the railroad company has provided another place in the construction of its roadbed for flow of the water, or unless another place for so crossing its right-of-way is agreed upon by the railroad company; and if located at the place provided by or agreed upon by the railroad company, such company shall be estopped from afterwards objecting to such location on the ground that it is not the place of the natural waterway.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 3; Shan., § 3871a23; Code 1932, § 4242; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-721; T.C.A. §69-6-117.

69-5-118. Engineer's assistants.

The engineer may employ necessary help, such as axmen, rodmen, returning an itemized expense account, or the court may contract with such engineer to furnish all such help, and to do the entire work, or any specific part thereof, for a sum stipulated and agreed upon.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 3; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 1; Shan., § 3871a24; mod. Code 1932, § 4233; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-722; T.C.A. §69-6-118.

69-5-119. Plan approval or rejection.

Upon the filing of the return of the engineer, the county court shall examine the return, and if the plan seems to be expedient and meets the approval of the court, it shall order the county clerk to cause notice to be given, as provided in this part, but if it does not appear to be expedient, or is not approved, the court is authorized to direct the engineer, or another engineer selected by it, to prepare another plan. If the court should deem the proposed improvement inexpedient or inadvisable, after an examination of the return of the engineer, or after a second or further return, it may dismiss the petition and proceedings, and, in that event, it shall adjudge all costs and expenses incurred against the petitioners and the sureties on the bond.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 4; Shan., § 3871a25; mod. Code 1932, § 4234; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-723; T.C.A. §69-6-119.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-120. Issuance and service of summons upon approval of plan.

When the plan, if any, has the approval of the court, the court shall order the county clerk to issue a summons, or writ, to the sheriff of the proper county, the writs to run in the name of the state, commanding the sheriff to summon the persons named in the writ to appear before the court on the day set by it for the hearing of the petition. The writ or summons shall name to be served the owners of all the tracts or lots of land not petitioners, within the proposed levee, improvement, or drainage district, as shown by the tax books of the county, or by affidavit filed, and upon the persons in actual occupancy of the lands or lots, and also upon any lienholder or encumbrancers of any land in the proposed district, as shown by the county records, and shall notify them of the pendency of the petition and the prayer of the petition; but no copy of the petition shall accompany the writ.

Such writ shall be served at least ten (10) days before the time set for the hearing of the petition; but the writ shall not be issued for or served upon any of the persons described in subsection (a), who shall file with the clerk a statement in writing, signed by the party entering an appearance at the hearing and waiving any additional notice, or the service of the writ may be acknowledged.

In case any such owner, lienholder, or encumbrancer is a nonresident of the state, or that person's name or residence cannot be ascertained after diligent inquiry, and these facts are made to appear by affidavit filed, then publication shall be made for such party for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper of the county where the proceeding is pending notifying such party or parties of the pendency and prayer of the petition, and to appear at the time set for the hearing of the petition, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the time set for such hearing. Proof of such publication may be made as provided by law in chancery cases. The actual owners, or such encumbrancers, may be made to appear to the clerk by the affidavit of any person acquainted with the facts or by the averments of the petition if sworn to.

Such writ, or summons, and the publication notice need not set out in any detail the contents of the petition, or of its prayer.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 4; 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 25, § 2; Shan., §§ 3871a26-3871a29; Code 1932, §§ 4235-4238; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-724 — 70-727; T.C.A. §69-6-120.

69-5-121. Hearing postponed pending notice — Hearing without formal answers.

If, at the time set for the hearing, it appears to the court that any person entitled to notice as provided has not had such notice, the hearing shall be adjourned until such person can be given the required notice, and the court shall not lose jurisdiction of the subject matter or of the person already properly notified by such adjournment or postponement. The persons concerned may appear and be heard without formally answering such petition in writing.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 4; Shan., § 3871a30; Code 1932, § 4239; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-728; T.C.A. §69-6-121.

69-5-122. Further examination and report by engineer.

At such hearing, the court may order the engineer, or a new engineer appointed by the court, if deemed advisable, to make further examination and report to the court as to the improvement, in which event the hearing shall be continued until the filing of such further report.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 6; Shan., § 3871a33; Code 1932, § 4250; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-729; T.C.A. §69-6-122.

69-5-123. Special assessment to pay preliminary costs and expenses.

After the report of the engineer has been filed, accompanied by the plat and a description of the land included within the proposed district, and a description of the surrounding landowners, of the respective tracts of land within the proposed district, and the names of the owners of the tracts, the court shall have the power, if it deems it expedient, to make a special assessment upon all the lands within the proposed district for an amount sufficient to pay the costs and expenses already incurred to the date of filing of the engineer's report, including the expenses in collecting the special assessment.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b1; Code 1932, § 4240; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-730; T.C.A. §69-6-123.

69-5-124. Special assessment — Petition — Notice of hearing.

A special assessment shall be made only upon petition signed and sworn to by one (1) or more persons owning land within the proposed district, and praying that provision be made for funds to defray the preliminary costs and expenses already incurred up to that stage of the proceedings. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall set a day for the hearing of that matter and direct that publication for all landowners within the proposed district who are not petitioners in the petition be made in some newspaper published in the county in which the district is located, and if located in more than one (1) county, then in a publication in each county in which the land in the proposed district is located, the publication to be made for three (3) consecutive weeks, the last publication to be at least ten (10) days before the day set for the hearing. The publication shall notify such landowners of the pending suit and the prayer of the petition for the creation and collection of a fund to pay the preliminary costs and expenses and the day fixed for the hearing, and notify the landowners not petitioners in the petition to appear and show cause why an assessment to create the fund should not be made. The landowners shall make their appearance and file their objections, if any, on or before twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day set for hearing.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b2; Code 1932, § 4241; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-731; T.C.A. §69-6-124.

69-5-125. Special assessment — Hearing — Amount and basis of assessment.

After the hour fixed for the filing of objections, the court shall proceed to hear and determine the matter of making an assessment to raise a fund for the payment of the preliminary costs and expenses. The court will determine from proof offered the amount necessary to cover the cost and expenses, and if the court is of the opinion that it is not expedient to make an assessment for such purposes, the court will so decree; but if the court is of the opinion that it is expedient, the court will make an assessment for the amount determined upon the respective tracts of land in the proposed improvement district, and make the assessment on the basis of acreage.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b3; Code 1932, § 4242; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-732; T.C.A. §69-6-125.

69-5-126. Special assessment — Appeal.

Any party aggrieved may appeal from the decision of the court in making or refusing to make the assessment. The appeal shall be made in the same manner and upon the same terms provided for appeals from the action of the court in creating or refusing to create a drainage district as provided in part 5 of this chapter.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b4; Code 1932, § 4243; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-733; T.C.A. §69-6-126.

69-5-127. Special assessment — Collection.

When the assessment has been made, the court shall fix the dates within which it shall be collected, and the county clerk shall make out an assessment list or book, giving alphabetically the name of the owner, and the boundaries of the land, the number of acres, and the amount assessed against each tract. The county clerk will make the assessment list or book substantially in the form used for state and county tax books, and when so made shall certify it to the trustee of the county, and it shall be the duty of the trustee of the county to proceed at once to collect the assessments within the dates prescribed by the court. The trustee shall pay the amount collected on the assessment to the county clerk, to be paid out on the cost and expenses under the orders of the court, and for collecting and paying over the assessments, the trustee will be allowed, as compensation for collecting and paying over the funds, two percent (2%) of the amount collected and paid over.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b5; Code 1932, § 4244; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-734; T.C.A. §69-6-127.

Cross-References. Compensation of trustee for collecting and paying out assessments, §69-5-835.

69-5-128. Special assessment — Collection by other counties.

However, if the district sought to be created embraces lands lying in more than one (1) county, the clerk of the county in which the petition was filed, and the matter is pending, will make out the assessment list or book for the entire district, and shall then copy so much of the assessment roll or book, as contains the assessments on lands in any county other than the county where the petition was filed, and the matter is pending, and certify under seal that it is a correct copy of that part or portion of such roll or book, and transmit or deliver it to the trustee of such other county, and take a receipt for the same, and collect the same, and pay over the amount collected to the clerk of the county where the petition was filed and the matter is pending.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b6; Code 1932, § 4245; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-735; T.C.A. §69-6-128.

69-5-129. Special assessment constitutes lien.

The assessment so made shall be a lien upon the respective tracts of land upon which it is assessed, and this lien shall be enforced in the same manner as provided for the enforcement of liens in §§69-5-819 —69-5-823.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b7; Code 1932, § 4246; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-736; T.C.A. §69-6-129.

69-5-130. Special assessments — Bonds of county trustee and county clerk — Procedure not to delay other proceedings.

The county trustee, or trustees, before receiving the assessment roll, or book, and proceeding to the collection of the assessments, and the county clerk, before receiving the funds from the trustee or trustees, shall, respectively, enter into a bond in double the amount that will come into their hands, respectively, payable to the state of Tennessee, and conditioned for the faithful paying over and accounting for the funds arising from the assessment; provided, that this proceeding to create a fund for the payment of the cost and expenses shall not interfere with or delay the other proceedings.

Acts 1923, ch. 55, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 3871a30b8; Code 1932, § 4247; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-737; T.C.A. §69-6-130.

69-5-131. Payment of preliminary expenses — Methods of refunding.

The preliminary expenses of such district, ditch, drain, or watercourse improvement, not including contracts for construction, may be paid by order of the county legislative body of the county in which the lands lie of such improvement district out of the general county fund, and, if so paid, to be refunded to the county out of assessments collected from the lands of such improvement district when so collected, and if not so repaid, for any reason, then to be adjudged against and collected out of the bond of the petitioners required by §69-5-103, and thus repaid to the county.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 39; Shan., § 3871a149; Code 1932, § 4384; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-738; T.C.A. §69-6-131.

69-5-132. Preliminary expenses — Contribution by county.

The county legislative body has the right to contribute, out of the general county fund, such amount as it sees fit to be used in the payment of such preliminary expenses, without requiring the same to be paid back or refunded to the county; and where any county has previously, by order of the county legislative body, advanced or paid any of the preliminary expenses, the county legislative body may, if it sees fit, by proper order donate the amount, or any part thereof, and not require the amount so donated or contributed to be paid back or refunded to the county.

Acts 1913 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 37, § 1; Shan., § 3871a150; Code 1932, § 4385; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-739; T.C.A. §69-6-132.

69-5-133. Expense fund may be required, or judgment rendered on bond.

If the county legislative body does not see fit to order such preliminary expenses so paid, and the parties to whom such expenses may be owing are not willing to agree to wait until a fund for their payment can be provided by special assessments upon such district, then the county court by proper order shall require the petitioner or petitioners to pay to the county clerk a fund sufficient to pay such preliminary expenses, and the bond required of petitioners by §69-5-103 shall be liable for such preliminary expenses, and judgment on the bond may be rendered at any time by the county court to the end such fund for expenses be provided, just as courts render judgments on cost bonds, and one such judgment shall not prevent other judgments on the same bond, so the sum of the judgments does not exceed the penalty of the bond.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 39; Shan., § 3871a151; Code 1932, § 4386; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-740; T.C.A. §69-6-133.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-134. Expense fund paid from time to time.

Such fund for expenses may be paid in from time to time, under the orders of the court, as may be needed.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 39; Shan., § 3871a152; Code 1932, § 4387; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-741; T.C.A. §69-6-134.

69-5-135. Payment of expense fund to be refunded out of district funds.

All sums so paid by the petitioners or their sureties on their bonds shall be refunded and repaid to the person or persons so paying them out of the funds of such improvement district when such funds have been realized under this chapter.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 39; Shan., § 3871a153; Code 1932, § 4388; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-742; T.C.A. §69-6-135.

69-5-136. Establishment or refusal of district.

The county court, upon the hearing of the petition at the time set for hearing, or at the time to which the matter has been adjourned or continued, shall proceed to determine the sufficiency of the petition in form and manner, which petition may be amended at any time, as to form and substance, before final action on the petition. If the court finds that such levee or drainage or improvement district would not be for the public benefit or utility, or conducive to the public health or welfare, it shall dismiss the proceedings; but if the court finds such improvement conducive to the public health or welfare, or to the public benefit or utility, it shall determine and adjudge the necessity for the improvement of such district, and if no claim for damages has been filed, as provided in §69-5-201, the court may, if deemed advisable, locate and establish the district, or may refuse to establish the same, as the court may deem best.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 6; Shan., § 3871a32; Code 1932, § 4249; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-743; T.C.A. §69-6-136.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.

69-5-137. Survey after district established — Estimate of costs — Report of engineer — Replacement of engineer.

After the district is established by the county court, and all damages paid or secured as provided in part 2 of this chapter, if the county court is of opinion that the report of the engineer already made is not sufficiently full or definite to enable the proper letting of contracts for the construction of the improvement, or, for other reasons, is not as full and definite as it should be, the court shall direct the engineer, or another appointed by the court for the purpose, to make a further and more complete survey and estimates of such district and cost of proposed improvements, and report to the court as to the same, giving all necessary and required information, how much of the improvement will be upon each tract of land, as nearly as practicable, giving definite estimates as to cost and character of work, and dividing the work into convenient sections for making contracts, and giving such other particulars as the court may see fit to direct. The report of such engineer shall be made and filed with the county clerk without unreasonable delay. If such engineer fails to act with reasonable promptness, the court may remove the engineer and appoint another in the engineer's stead.

Acts 1909, ch. 185, § 10; Shan., § 3871a51; Code 1932, § 4268; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-744; T.C.A. §69-6-137.

Compiler's Notes. The county court structure referred to in this chapter was abolished by the 1978 amendments to Tenn. Const. arts. VI and VII. Legislative functions formerly exercised by county courts now belong to county legislative bodies. Judicial functions now belong to general sessions, chancery, or circuit courts. See also §69-5-102.